Illinois, session 104th, HB4624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 10. The Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera 5Act is amended by changing Section 10-20 and by adding Section 610-22 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 706/10-20)8    Sec. 10-20. Requirements. 9    (a) The Board shall develop basic guidelines for the use 10of officer-worn body cameras by law enforcement agencies. The 11guidelines developed by the Board shall be the basis for the 12written policy which must be adopted by each law enforcement 13agency which employs the use of officer-worn body cameras. The 14written policy adopted by the law enforcement agency must 15include, at a minimum, all of the following:16        (1) Cameras must be equipped with pre-event recording, 17    capable of recording at least the 30 seconds prior to 18    camera activation, unless the officer-worn body camera was 19    purchased and acquired by the law enforcement agency prior 20    to July 1, 2015.21        (2) Cameras must be capable of recording for a period 22    of 10 hours or more, unless the officer-worn body camera 23    was purchased and acquired by the law enforcement agency   HB4624- 2 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    prior to July 1, 2015.2        (3) Cameras must be turned on at all times when the 3    officer is in uniform and is responding to calls for 4    service or engaged in any law enforcement-related 5    encounter or activity that occurs while the officer is on 6    duty.7            (A) If exigent circumstances exist which prevent 8        the camera from being turned on, the camera must be 9        turned on as soon as practicable.10            (B) Officer-worn body cameras may be turned off 11        when the officer is inside of a patrol car which is 12        equipped with a functioning in-car camera; however, 13        the officer must turn on the camera upon exiting the 14        patrol vehicle for law enforcement-related encounters.15            (C) Officer-worn body cameras may be turned off 16        when the officer is inside a correctional facility or 17        courthouse which is equipped with a functioning camera 18        system. 19        (4) Cameras must be turned off when: 20            (A) the victim of a crime requests that the camera 21        be turned off, and unless impractical or impossible, 22        that request is made on the recording;23            (B) a witness of a crime or a community member who 24        wishes to report a crime requests that the camera be 25        turned off, and unless impractical or impossible that 26        request is made on the recording;   HB4624- 3 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1            (C) the officer is interacting with a confidential 2        informant used by the law enforcement agency; or3            (D) an officer of the Department of Revenue enters 4        a Department of Revenue facility or conducts an 5        interview during which return information will be 6        discussed or visible. 7        However, an officer may continue to record or resume 8    recording a victim or a witness, if exigent circumstances 9    exist, or if the officer has reasonable articulable 10    suspicion that a victim or witness, or confidential 11    informant has committed or is in the process of committing 12    a crime. Under these circumstances, and unless impractical 13    or impossible, the officer must indicate on the recording 14    the reason for continuing to record despite the request of 15    the victim or witness.16        (4.5) Cameras may be turned off when the officer is 17    engaged in community caretaking functions. However, the 18    camera must be turned on when the officer has reason to 19    believe that the person on whose behalf the officer is 20    performing a community caretaking function has committed 21    or is in the process of committing a crime. If exigent 22    circumstances exist which prevent the camera from being 23    turned on, the camera must be turned on as soon as 24    practicable.25        (5) The officer must provide notice of recording to 26    any person if the person has a reasonable expectation of   HB4624- 4 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    privacy and proof of notice must be evident in the 2    recording. If exigent circumstances exist which prevent 3    the officer from providing notice, notice must be provided 4    as soon as practicable.5        (6) (A) For the purposes of redaction or duplicating 6    recordings, access to camera recordings shall be 7    restricted to only those personnel responsible for those 8    purposes. The recording officer or his or her supervisor 9    may not redact, duplicate, or otherwise alter the 10    recording officer's camera recordings. Except as otherwise 11    provided in this Section, the recording officer and his or 12    her supervisor may access and review recordings prior to 13    completing incident reports or other documentation, 14    provided that the supervisor discloses that fact in the 15    report or documentation.16            (i) A law enforcement officer shall not have 17        access to or review his or her body-worn camera 18        recordings or the body-worn camera recordings of 19        another officer prior to completing incident reports 20        or other documentation when the officer: 21                (a) has been involved in or is a witness to an 22            officer-involved shooting, use of deadly force 23            incident, or use of force incidents resulting in 24            great bodily harm;25                (b) is ordered to write a report in response 26            to or during the investigation of a misconduct   HB4624- 5 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1            complaint against the officer.2            (ii) If the officer subject to subparagraph (i) 3        prepares a report, any report shall be prepared 4        without viewing body-worn camera recordings, and 5        subject to supervisor's approval, officers may file 6        amendatory reports after viewing body-worn camera 7        recordings. Supplemental reports under this provision 8        shall also contain documentation regarding access to 9        the video footage. 10            (B) The recording officer's assigned field 11        training officer may access and review recordings for 12        training purposes. Any detective or investigator 13        directly involved in the investigation of a matter may 14        access and review recordings which pertain to that 15        investigation but may not have access to delete or 16        alter such recordings. 17        (7) Recordings made on officer-worn cameras must be 18    retained by the law enforcement agency or by the camera 19    vendor used by the agency, on a recording medium for a 20    period of 90 days.21            (A) Under no circumstances shall any recording, 22        except for a non-law enforcement related activity or 23        encounter, made with an officer-worn body camera be 24        altered, erased, or destroyed prior to the expiration 25        of the 90-day storage period. In the event any 26        recording made with an officer-worn body camera is   HB4624- 6 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1        altered, erased, or destroyed prior to the expiration 2        of the 90-day storage period, the law enforcement 3        agency shall maintain, for a period of one year, a 4        written record including (i) the name of the 5        individual who made such alteration, erasure, or 6        destruction, and (ii) the reason for any such 7        alteration, erasure, or destruction. 8            (B) Following the 90-day storage period, any and 9        all recordings made with an officer-worn body camera 10        must be destroyed, unless any encounter captured on 11        the recording has been flagged. An encounter is deemed 12        to be flagged when: 13                (i) a formal or informal complaint has been 14            filed;15                (ii) the officer discharged his or her firearm 16            or used force during the encounter; 17                (iii) death or great bodily harm occurred to 18            any person in the recording; 19                (iv) the encounter resulted in a detention or 20            an arrest, excluding traffic stops which resulted 21            in only a minor traffic offense or business 22            offense;23                (v) the officer is the subject of an internal 24            investigation or otherwise being investigated for 25            possible misconduct; 26                (vi) the supervisor of the officer,   HB4624- 7 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1            prosecutor, defendant, or court determines that 2            the encounter has evidentiary value in a criminal 3            prosecution; or4                (vii) the recording officer requests that the 5            video be flagged for official purposes related to 6            his or her official duties or believes it may have 7            evidentiary value in a criminal prosecution.8            (C) Under no circumstances shall any recording 9        made with an officer-worn body camera relating to a 10        flagged encounter be altered or destroyed prior to 2 11        years after the recording was flagged. If the flagged 12        recording was used in a criminal, civil, or 13        administrative proceeding, the recording shall not be 14        destroyed except upon a final disposition and order 15        from the court.16            (D) Nothing in this Act prohibits law enforcement 17        agencies from labeling officer-worn body camera video 18        within the recording medium; provided that the 19        labeling does not alter the actual recording of the 20        incident captured on the officer-worn body camera. The 21        labels, titles, and tags shall not be construed as 22        altering the officer-worn body camera video in any 23        way. 24        (8) Following the 90-day storage period, recordings 25    may be retained if a supervisor at the law enforcement 26    agency designates the recording for training purposes. If   HB4624- 8 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    the recording is designated for training purposes, the 2    recordings may be viewed by officers, in the presence of a 3    supervisor or training instructor, for the purposes of 4    instruction, training, or ensuring compliance with agency 5    policies. 6        (9) Recordings shall not be used to discipline law 7    enforcement officers unless:8            (A) a formal or informal complaint of misconduct 9        has been made;10            (B) a use of force incident has occurred;11            (C) the encounter on the recording could result in 12        a formal investigation under the Uniform Peace 13        Officers' Disciplinary Act; or14            (D) as corroboration of other evidence of 15        misconduct.16        Nothing in this paragraph (9) shall be construed to 17    limit or prohibit a law enforcement officer from being 18    subject to an action that does not amount to discipline.19        (10) The law enforcement agency shall ensure proper 20    care and maintenance of officer-worn body cameras. Upon 21    becoming aware, officers must as soon as practical 22    document and notify the appropriate supervisor of any 23    technical difficulties, failures, or problems with the 24    officer-worn body camera or associated equipment. Upon 25    receiving notice, the appropriate supervisor shall make 26    every reasonable effort to correct and repair any of the   HB4624- 9 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    officer-worn body camera equipment.2        (11) No officer may hinder or prohibit any person, not 3    a law enforcement officer, from recording a law 4    enforcement officer in the performance of his or her 5    duties in a public place or when the officer has no 6    reasonable expectation of privacy. The law enforcement 7    agency's written policy shall indicate the potential 8    criminal penalties, as well as any departmental 9    discipline, which may result from unlawful confiscation or 10    destruction of the recording medium of a person who is not 11    a law enforcement officer. However, an officer may take 12    reasonable action to maintain safety and control, secure 13    crime scenes and accident sites, protect the integrity and 14    confidentiality of investigations, and protect the public 15    safety and order.16    (b) Before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 17the 104th General Assembly and on and after the date that is 5 18years after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 19104th General Assembly, recordings Recordings made with the 20use of an officer-worn body camera are not subject to 21disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, except that:22        (1) if the subject of the encounter has a reasonable 23    expectation of privacy, at the time of the recording, any 24    recording which is flagged, due to the filing of a 25    complaint, discharge of a firearm, use of force, arrest or 26    detention, or resulting death or bodily harm, shall be   HB4624- 10 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    disclosed in accordance with the Freedom of Information 2    Act if:3            (A) the subject of the encounter captured on the 4        recording is a victim or witness; and5            (B) the law enforcement agency obtains written 6        permission of the subject or the subject's legal 7        representative;8        (2) except as provided in paragraph (1) of this 9    subsection (b), any recording which is flagged due to the 10    filing of a complaint, discharge of a firearm, use of 11    force, arrest or detention, or resulting death or bodily 12    harm shall be disclosed in accordance with the Freedom of 13    Information Act; and14        (3) upon request, the law enforcement agency shall 15    disclose, in accordance with the Freedom of Information 16    Act, the recording to the subject of the encounter 17    captured on the recording or to the subject's attorney, or 18    the officer or his or her legal representative.19    For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection (b), 20the subject of the encounter does not have a reasonable 21expectation of privacy if the subject was arrested as a result 22of the encounter. For purposes of subparagraph (A) of 23paragraph (1) of this subsection (b), "witness" does not 24include a person who is a victim or who was arrested as a 25result of the encounter. 26    Before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the   HB4624- 11 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1104th General Assembly and on and after the date that is 5 2years after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 3104th General Assembly, only Only recordings or portions of 4recordings responsive to the request shall be available for 5inspection or reproduction. Any recording disclosed under the 6Freedom of Information Act shall be redacted to remove 7identification of any person that appears on the recording and 8is not the officer, a subject of the encounter, or directly 9involved in the encounter. Nothing in this subsection (b) 10shall require the disclosure of any recording or portion of 11any recording which would be exempt from disclosure under the 12Freedom of Information Act.13    On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 14the 104th General Assembly and before the date that is 5 years 15after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 16General Assembly, recordings made with the use of an 17officer-worn body camera are not subject to disclosure under 18the Freedom of Information Act, except as provided in Section 1910-22 of this Act.20    (c) Nothing in this Section or Section 10-22 shall limit 21access to a camera recording for the purposes of complying 22with Supreme Court rules or the rules of evidence.23(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 24102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 2512-6-22.)   HB4624- 12 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1    (50 ILCS 706/10-22 new)2    Sec. 10-22. Officer-worn body camera footage disclosure.3    (a) The General Assembly finds that:4        (1) Illinois law enforcement agencies face a surge of 5    Freedom of Information Act requests from out-of-state and 6    foreign entities seeking officer-worn body camera footage 7    for monetized online content.8        (2) These requests impose overwhelming redaction 9    burdens, divert police resources, compromise victim and 10    minor privacy, and create new risks to officer safety.11        (3) Illinois must balance transparency with privacy, 12    safety, and responsible use of public resources.13        (4) The purpose of this Section is to ensure 14    legitimate access while preventing commercial 15    exploitation, harassment, doxxing, and foreign misuse of 16    sensitive law enforcement video.17    (b) Officer-worn body camera footage is exempt from 18copying and disclosure under this Act and the Freedom of 19Information Act if the requester does not provide with the 20request:21        (1) a certification of the requester's identity, 22    including a copy of the requester's government-issued 23    identification card;24        (2) a certification of the requester's contact 25    information, including a verified mailing address and a 26    working phone number;  HB4624- 13 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1        (3) a certification that the requested officer-worn 2    body camera footage will not be used for the purposes 3    listed under paragraph (15) of subsection (c); and4        (4) a certification that the requested officer-worn 5    body camera footage will not be used for the purposes 6    listed under paragraph (16) of subsection (c).7    (c) Officer-worn body camera footage is exempt from 8copying and disclosure under this Act and the Freedom of 9Information Act if:10        (1) it reveals the home address of a law enforcement 11    officer;12        (2) it reveals a private residence of a law 13    enforcement officer;14        (3) it reveals tactical positions or strategies used 15    by a law enforcement agency;16        (4) it reveals undisclosed law enforcement methods 17    used by a law enforcement agency;18        (5) it reveals a family member of a law enforcement 19    officer;20        (6) it depicts a domestic violence victim;21        (7) it depicts a sexual assault victim;22        (8) it depicts a minor;23        (9) it depicts an individual undergoing a mental 24    health crisis;25        (10) it depicts an individual undergoing a medical 26    emergency;  HB4624- 14 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1        (11) it depicts an individual inside a private home;2        (12) it involves an active investigation;3        (13) it relates to pending criminal charges;4        (14) it would prejudice a jury or compromise 5    prosecution;6        (15) the purpose of the request is for commercial 7    exploitation of the footage, sale or resale of the 8    footage, mass distribution of the footage, scraping of the 9    footage using a scraping program, or training of 10    artificial intelligence using the footage;11        (16) the purpose of the request is to use the footage 12    to:13            (A) harass or threaten to an individual;14            (B) search for and publish on the Internet with 15        malicious intent private or identifying information 16        about officers, victims, or witnesses; or17            (C) identify family members of law enforcement 18        officers; or19        (17) it is exempt under any other provision in the 20    Freedom of Information Act. 21    (d) A law enforcement agency shall make available for 22inspection and copying in accordance with the Freedom of 23Information Act officer-worn body camera footage that is not 24exempt from disclosure under either this Act or the Freedom of 25Information Act. 26    (e) A law enforcement agency may deny a request that   HB4624- 15 -LRB104 17154 BDA 33898 b1violates this Section or any standard established under this 2Section.3    (f) A public body, law enforcement agency, or employee 4acting in good faith reliance on this Act or the Freedom of 5Information Act shall not be subject to civil liability solely 6for denying or limiting access to a body-worn camera 7recording, as long as the denial or limitation is based on a 8reasonable interpretation of applicable law.9    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 10judicial review under the Freedom of Information Act or 11provide immunity for willful or knowing violations of law. 12This Section is limited to the treatment of body-worn camera 13recordings under the Freedom of Information Act and shall not 14be construed to regulate law enforcement practices, criminal 15procedure, or evidence outside of the scope of the Freedom of 16Information Act.17    (h) Enforcement of this Section shall occur exclusively 18through the remedies and procedures provided under the Freedom 19of Information Act. 20    (i) This Section is repealed 5 years after the effective 21date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.